Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 553. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND OTHER BOARD PERSONNEL

Sec. 553.001. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. The board shall employ an executive director.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.002. QUALIFICATIONS OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. The executive director must be a pharmacist.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.003. GENERAL DUTIES OF EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The executive director is an ex officio member of the board without vote.

(b) The executive director is a full-time employee of the board and shall:

(1) serve as secretary to the board;

(2) perform the regular administrative functions of the board and any other duty as the board directs; and

(3) under the direction of the board, perform the duties required by this subtitle or designated by the board.

(c) The executive director may not perform a discretionary or decision-making function for which the board is solely responsible.

(d) The executive director shall keep the seal of the board. The executive director may affix the seal only in the manner prescribed by the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 553.004. PERSONNEL. The board may employ persons in positions or capacities the board considers necessary to properly conduct the board's business and fulfill the board's responsibilities under this subtitle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.005. EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS. (a) A person may not be an employee of the board employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.), if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care.

(b) A person may not act as general counsel to the board if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 553.006. POSSESSION BY EMPLOYEE OF REGULATED SUBSTANCE. A board employee may possess a dangerous drug or controlled substance when acting in the employee's official capacity.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.007. DIVISION OF RESPONSIBILITIES. The board shall develop and implement policies that clearly define the responsibilities of the board and the staff of the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.008. QUALIFICATIONS AND STANDARDS OF CONDUCT INFORMATION. The board shall provide, as often as necessary, to its members and employees information regarding their:

(1) qualifications for office or employment under this subtitle; and

(2) responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.009. CAREER LADDER PROGRAM; PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS. (a) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall develop an intra-agency career ladder program. The program must require intra-agency postings of all nonentry level positions concurrently with any public posting.

(b) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall develop a system of annual performance evaluations. All merit pay for board employees must be based on the system established under this subsection.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 553.010. EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY POLICY; REPORT. (a) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement to ensure implementation of an equal employment opportunity program under which all personnel transactions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin. The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies related to recruitment, evaluation, selection, appointment, training, and promotion of personnel that are in compliance with Chapter 21, Labor Code;

(2) a comprehensive analysis of the board workforce that meets federal and state guidelines;

(3) procedures by which a determination can be made of significant underuse in the board workforce of all persons for whom federal or state guidelines encourage a more equitable balance; and

(4) reasonable methods to appropriately address those areas of significant underuse.

(b) A policy statement prepared under Subsection (a) must:

(1) cover an annual period;

(2) be updated annually;

(3) be reviewed by the Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (a)(1); and

(4) be filed with the governor.

(c) The governor shall deliver a biennial report to the legislature based on the information received under Subsection (b). The report may be made separately or as a part of other biennial reports made to the legislature.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.